Utah statutes.
57-8-18.   Blanket mortgages and other blanket liens affecting unit at time of first conveyance.

At the time of the first conveyance of each unit, every mortgage and other lien affecting such unit, including the percentage of undivided interest of the unit in the common areas and facilities, shall have been paid and satisfied of record, or the unit being conveyed and its percentage of undivided interest in the common areas and facilities shall have been released therefrom by partial release duly recorded. The provisions of this section shall not apply, however, to any withdrawable land in a contractible condominium.



Amended by Chapter 173, 1975 General Session

